Missouri, session 2026, SB1546.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 361 and 362, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto two new sections, to be known as sections
361.1200 and 362.1200, to read as follows:
361.1200. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Financial services", any service or product
offered to the consumer or business market by a bank, trust
company, building and loan association, credit union, or any
other entity regulated by the division of finance;
(2) "Person", one or more individuals, partnerships,
associations, limited liability companies, corporations,
unincorporated organizations, mutual companies, joint stock
companies, trusts, agents, legal representatives, trustees,
trustees in bankruptcy, receivers, labor organizations,
public bodies, and public corporations and the state of
Missouri and all political subdivisions and agencies
thereof. Such term shall include federally chartered
banking institutions that accept state deposits;
(3) "Trade association", any corporation,
unincorporated association, federation, business league, or

SB 1546 2
professional or business organization not organized or
operated for profit and no part of the net earnings of which
inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or
individual that is:
(a) An organization described in 26 U.S.C. Section
501(c)(6) and exempt from tax under Section 501(a) of such
title; and
(b) Two or more members of which are manufacturers or
sellers of a qualified product as defined by 15 U.S.C.
Section 7903(4).
2. It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice for
any person to refuse to provide financial services, refrain
from continuing to provide existing financial services,
terminate existing financial services with, or otherwise
discriminate in the provision of financial services to, a
person or trade association solely because such person or
trade association is engaged in the lawful commerce of
firearms or ammunition products and is licensed pursuant to
18 U.S.C. Chapter 44 or is a trade association.
3. Whenever the attorney general has reason to believe
that any person is engaging, has engaged, or is about to
engage in any act or practice declared unlawful by this
section, the attorney general shall, upon written request or
by his or her own initiative, investigate and, upon finding
a probable violation of this section, bring an action in the
name of the state against such person:
(1) To obtain a declaratory judgment that the act or
practice violates the provisions of this section;
(2) To enjoin any act or practice that violates the
provisions of this section by issuance of a temporary
restraining order or preliminary or permanent injunction,
without bond, upon the giving of appropriate notice;

SB 1546 3
(3) To recover civil penalties of up to ten thousand
dollars per violation of this section plus reasonable
expenses, investigative costs, and attorney's fees.
362.1200. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Financial institution", a bank, savings and loan
association, trust company, credit union, or any other
entity that directly or indirectly holds an account
belonging to a consumer that is organized and operating
according to the laws of any state, the District of
Columbia, or the United States that is lawfully operating
within this state;
(2) "Regulatory agency", any regulatory or
administrative officer or body existing under the laws or
constitution of any state or the United States with
jurisdiction with regard to the activities and operations of
financial institutions. This term includes, but is not
limited to, the following:
(a) The Missouri division of credit unions, and any
successor division;
(b) The federal Consumer Financial Protection Bureau,
and any successor agency;
(c) The National Credit Union Administration, and its
successors;
(d) The federal Office of the Comptroller of the
Currency, and its successors;
(e) The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and its
successors; and
(f) The United States Department of Justice, and its
successors;
(3) "Written guidance", a record of general
applicability developed by a regulatory agency that states

SB 1546 4
the regulatory agency's current approach to, or
interpretation of, law, or describes how the regulatory
agency will exercise discretionary functions, such as
promulgated rules and regulations, advisory opinions,
regulatory notices, guidance documents, manuals,
interpretative memoranda, staff instructions, policy
statements, circulars, bulletins, press releases, appendices
to any rules and regulations, sample forms provided in such
appendices or by a regulatory agency, and a regulatory
agency's written response to an inquiry by a financial
institution. This term includes records that are publicly
available or communicated directly to the financial
institution. This definition includes, but is not limited
to, written guidance related to:
(a) Mandatory mortgage loan disclosures, as may be
required by the federal Truth in Lending Act, 15 U.S.C.
Section 1601, et seq., the federal Real Estate Procedures
Act, 12 U.S.C. Section 2601, et seq., Regulation X, 12 CFR
Section 1024, and Regulation Z, 12 CFR Section 1026, et
seq., and any amendments thereto or any regulations
promulgated thereunder;
(b) Mandatory overdraft disclosures and opt-in
practices, as may be required by the federal Electronic Fund
Transfer Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1693, et seq., Regulation E,
12 CFR Section 1005, et seq., and any amendments thereto or
any regulations promulgated thereunder; and
(c) Digital and website accessibility, as may be
required by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act, 42
U.S.C. Section 12101, et seq., Section 508 of the federal
Rehabilitation Act, 29 U.S.C. Section 794d, and any
amendments thereto or regulations promulgated thereunder.

SB 1546 5
2. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, a financial institution shall not be civilly
liable under the laws of this state for any act or omission
made when in compliance with or in good faith reliance on
any applicable rule, regulation, or written guidance issued
by a regulatory agency.
(2) This subsection shall be a bar to an action or
proceeding, notwithstanding that after such act or omission,
such rule, regulation, or written guidance is modified,
rescinded, or is held to be invalid by a court.
(3) This subsection shall not bar any actions or
proceeding when the act or omission of the financial
institution constituted fraudulent activity, intentional
misconduct, wanton or willful misconduct, or gross
negligence.
3. This section does not apply to the extent that any
statute, regulation, or treaty of the United States preempts
it.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
impair, limit, or affect the authority of the federal or any
state government, and any regulatory agencies thereof, to
bring any civil, criminal, or administrative enforcement
action.
✓